Wisconsin, session 2025, SB629.
do enact as follows:SB629,13Section 1. 440.52 (10) (f) of the statutes is amended to read:SB629,2,51440.52 (10) (f) Other remedies. In addition to any other remedies provided by 2law, a student who attends a school that is in violation of par. (a) or that has 3provided materially false, fraudulent, or misleading information to the student may 4bring a civil action to recover fees paid to the school in violation of par. (a) together 5with costs and disbursements, including reasonable attorney fees.SB629,26Section 2. Initial applicability.SB629,2,87(1) This act first applies to conduct that occurs on the effective date of this 8subsection.SB629,2,99